Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 160.14. A. The owner of a wind energy facility shall


be responsible, at its expense, for the proper decommissioning of


the facility upon abandonment or the end of the useful life of the


commercial wind energy equipment in the wind energy facility.


B. Proper decommissioning of a wind energy facility shall


include:


1. Removal of wind turbines, towers, buildings, cabling,


electrical components, foundations, and any other associated


facilities, to a depth of thirty (30) inches below grade; and



Req. No. 3217 Page 1


2. Disturbed earth being graded and reseeded or otherwise


restored to substantially the same physical condition as existed


prior to the construction of the wind energy facility by the owner,


excluding roads, unless the landowner specifically requests in


writing that the roads or other land surface areas be restored.


C. The decommissioning of the wind energy facility, or


individual pieces of commercial wind energy equipment, shall be


completed as follows:


1. By the owner of the wind energy facility within twelve (12)


months after abandonment or at the end of the useful life of the


commercial wind energy equipment in the wind energy facility; and


2. If the owner of the wind energy facility fails to complete


the decommissioning within the period at the end of the useful life


of the commercial wind energy equipment as prescribed in paragraph 1


of this subsection, the Corporation Commission shall take such


measures as are necessary to complete the decommissioning.


D. A lease or other agreement between a landowner and an owner


of a wind energy facility may contain provisions for decommissioning


that are more restrictive than provided for in this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3217 CN 1/13/2026 1:09:57 PM





Req. No. 3217 Page 2